Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-517
Commission; implementation goals.

The commission shall implement sections 86-512 to 86-524 in accordance with the policy objectives described in sections 86-512, 86-513, and 86-516 and with the following goals:

(1) Expanding access to lifelong educational and training opportunities so that Nebraska's citizens and work force can function in the emerging information society;

(2) Stimulating and supporting information-based economic development that improves economic opportunity; and

(3) Expanding citizen access to government information.

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1507;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 287.